Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1719YH (6) 91 ll/jh H.F. 266 Section 1. Section 562A.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. If a person is required to pay an 3 application fee to a landlord prior to entering into a rental 4 agreement, the landlord shall refund fifty percent of the 5 application fee to the person if the applicant is not selected 6 as a tenant by the landlord to rent the dwelling unit. 7